trunk/incubator/apertium-en-lt.lt.dix
    <pardef n="abejotoj/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ai</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ą</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oje</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>oj</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ų</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oms</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>om</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>as</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omis</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ose</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>osna</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abiturien/tė__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tė</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tei</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tę</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėje</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėn</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>te</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>čių</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėms</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tes</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėmis</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tėse</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>tėsna</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ill"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tės</l>
          <r>tė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

    <e lm="alternatyva"><i>alternatyv</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apkrova"><i>apkrov</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aronija"><i>aronij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atpjova"><i>atpjov</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autostrada"><i>autostrad</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bačka"><i>bačk</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="burokiena"><i>burokien</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dalytoja"><i>dalytoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dergla"><i>dergl</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="distancija"><i>distancij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dveja"><i>dvej</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elektra"><i>elektr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fanaberija"><i>fanaberij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="furija"><i>furij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="geltena"><i>gelten</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gorila"><i>goril</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gysla"><i>gysl</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imatrikuliacija"><i>imatrikuliacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izobara"><i>izobar</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išmalda"><i>išmald</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="josena"><i>josen</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kanapa"><i>kanap</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaulinėtoja"><i>kaulinėtoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="klampuma"><i>klampum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompensacija"><i>kompensacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosmogonija"><i>kosmogonij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kupiūra"><i>kupiūr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laužykla"><i>laužykl</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lituanika"><i>lituanik</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maitėda"><i>maitėd</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="medlieva"><i>medliev</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="miniatiūra"><i>miniatiūr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mylia"><i>myli</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nenuovoka"><i>nenuovok</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nugarplauka"><i>nugarplauk</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nuosvyra"><i>nuosvyr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ortoepija"><i>ortoepij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pakraipa"><i>pakraip</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paršinga"><i>paršing</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paveiksluotoja"><i>paveiksluotoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perraša"><i>perraš</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pjova"><i>pjov</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="premjera"><i>premjer</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="puošyba"><i>puošyb</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rentgenograma"><i>rentgenogram</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sandūra"><i>sandūr</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seniena"><i>senien</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slėsnuma"><i>slėsnum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="struma"><i>strum</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarpa"><i>tarp</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troposfera"><i>troposfer</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vada"><i>vad</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ventiliacija"><i>ventiliacij</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="įgaliotoja"><i>įgaliotoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šlavinėtoja"><i>šlavinėtoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žlugdytoja"><i>žlugdytoj</i><par n="abejotoj/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="akišveitė"><i>akišvei</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aludarystė"><i>aludarys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apologetė"><i>apologe</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="asistentė"><i>asisten</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="auksakalystė"><i>auksakalys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baltakaktė"><i>baltakak</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beletristė"><i>beletris</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beturtė"><i>betur</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brauktė"><i>brauk</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dailidystė"><i>dailidys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="daugiavaikystė"><i>daugiavaikys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="despotė"><i>despo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="drapiruotė"><i>drapiruo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dygutė"><i>dygu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="elegantė"><i>elegan</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fantastė"><i>fantas</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaisravietė"><i>gaisravie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="giminystė"><i>giminys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="greitvietė"><i>greitvie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gvardietė"><i>gvardie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ignalinietė"><i>ignalinie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="išdavystė"><i>išdavys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="juodašimtė"><i>juodašim</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kalaitė"><i>kalai</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karalystė"><i>karalys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keltė"><i>kel</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kirvapentė"><i>kirvapen</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="knygdėtė"><i>knygdė</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korespondentė"><i>koresponden</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kunigaikštytė"><i>kunigaikšty</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kūdikystė"><i>kūdikys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="laureatė"><i>laurea</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="liniuotė"><i>liniuo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maksimalistė"><i>maksimalis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mažakalbystė"><i>mažakalbys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meksikietė"><i>meksikie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="motinystė"><i>motinys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nesveikaprotė"><i>nesveikapro</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="padangtė"><i>padang</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="paplutė"><i>paplu</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pedantė"><i>pedan</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plackartė"><i>plackar</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prezidentystė"><i>prezidentys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pusšventė"><i>pusšven</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="riedlentė"><i>riedlen</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seniūnystė"><i>seniūnys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skystė"><i>skys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stažuotė"><i>stažuo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tankistė"><i>tankis</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trumparegystė"><i>trumparegys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vagystė"><i>vagys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="veltėdystė"><i>veltėdys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viršininkystė"><i>viršininkys</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šakietė"><i>šakie</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šturmuotė"><i>šturmuo</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
    <e lm="žoliapjaustė"><i>žoliapjaus</i><par n="abiturien/tė__n"/></e>
